Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 2

County Department of Children's Services Act of 1979

37-2-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “County Department of Children's Services Act of 1979.”

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-401.

37-2-202. Authority to establish department.

The various counties are hereby authorized to establish and operate a department of children's services to take custody and guardianship of the person of any child adjudicated dependent and neglected, unruly or delinquent by a juvenile court and placed in the custody of such department.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-402.

37-2-203. Appointment of director and other personnel.

The county mayor may, with the approval of the county legislative body, appoint a director and such other personnel as may be deemed necessary to provide efficient management of homes and institutions owned or operated by the county, and to assure that children in custody of such department receive the proper care and services. Each such director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the appointing authority.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-403; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-2-204. Authority to establish and operate homes.

Counties and municipalities within this state are authorized and empowered to establish, erect, operate and maintain homes for the care and treatment of dependent and neglected, unruly and delinquent children, and to purchase services from any agency, public or private, that is authorized by law to receive or provide care or services for children.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-404.

37-2-205. Commitment of dependent and neglected, delinquent or unruly children — Contracts for per diem allowance — Records — Minimum qualifications and standards.

In addition to the dispositional alternatives provided by §§ 37-1-130 — 37-1-132, concerning dependent and neglected, delinquent or unruly children, the juvenile court judge of any county within the provisions of this part is hereby authorized and empowered to commit a child to the custody of such county department of children's services. Upon such commitment by the juvenile court judge, guardianship of the person of such child shall immediately transfer to the director of the county department.

When any child is committed to a county department, the state, from available budgetary funds of any state department through which federal or other funds may be provided by law for the purchase of child care, may contract with the county department to pay a per diem allowance for each child so committed for the period of time each such child is in custody of the county department. The per diem allowance shall be determined by negotiation and contract between the county and state department through which such funds are available.

The director of the county department shall keep or cause to be kept all records and reports required to be kept by a comparable state agency. Such records shall include the quarterly review of each child's treatment, rehabilitation and progress, and the procedures for such review prescribed by the director. Failure of the director to keep or maintain any such records and reports required to be kept by law shall relieve the state from its obligation to pay the county department the per diem allowance for any child upon whom inadequate records have been kept.

The county department shall ensure that services provided to children in its care and facilities provided for that purpose shall meet all minimum qualifications and standards established by contract with the contracting department, but in no event shall such qualifications or standards be less stringent than those mandated by applicable state or federal law or regulation for the children in the care of the department. Failure to meet such qualifications and standards shall entitle the contracting department to withhold funds payable to the county pursuant to the contract. In all cases, the contracting state department shall have the authority to conduct such monitoring and inspection as may be necessary to enforce this provision.

The department of children's services is authorized to enter into an agreement to pay a per diem allowance to a county for each delinquent child placed in a local facility for delinquent children operated under the direction of the court or other local public authority. As a condition of such payment, the agreement may require that the county pay to the department of children's services a per diem allowance in the same amount for each child committed from the county to the department of children's services. The per diem allowance shall be as agreed upon, but not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the current actual cost of maintaining a child in a state correctional institution.

In order to enhance communication between the department of children's services and juvenile court judges across the state, the department shall provide to the juvenile court judge(s) for each county a report which includes:

The number of commitments to state custody for dependent and neglected children, unruly children, and delinquent children for the previous twelve-month period by county; and

The statewide average commitment rate per thousand youth based on the latest county population data as provided by the department of health.

The report shall be provided to judges on a semiannual basis and shall also be made available on the department's web site.

The department may initiate a collaborative planning process at the time a county's commitment rate is believed to be likely to exceed two hundred percent (200%) of the statewide average commitment rate. Upon request of the court, the department shall partner with the court to develop and implement strategies to address any factors contributing to higher commitment rates in such county.

On or before January 31 of each year, the department of children's services shall provide to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families a report of county commitment data for the previous fiscal year and a description of actions taken as part of the collaborative planning process. The report shall be published as part of the department's annual report required by § 37-5-105(4).

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 5; 1983, ch. 239, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-405; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 46; 1996, ch. 1079, § 110; 2009, ch. 531, § 30; 2010, ch. 662, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(g); 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2015, ch. 178, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 38.

Compiler's Notes.

For the preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (f)(3), substituted “January 31” for “February 1” at the beginning of the first sentence; substituted “fiscal” for “calendar” preceding “year” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (f)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 178, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

37-2-206. Modification of court order.

The director of a county department of children's services, or the director's designee, or any interested party, may petition the committing court to modify an order awarding custody of a child to the county department on the ground that changed circumstances so require in the best interest of the child.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 6; T.C.A., § 37-406.

37-2-207. Use of facilities of another county.

Any county legislative body within the provisions of this part is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement with any other county for the use of the facility in its department of children's services. The county having such a department shall be entitled to reimbursement from the state in the same manner for any juvenile committed from such contracting county. Guardianship of all such juveniles committed from another county under this section shall immediately transfer to the director of the department of children's services to which the juvenile is committed.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 7; T.C.A., § 37-407.

37-2-208. Authority to appropriate funds.

The county legislative body is hereby authorized to appropriate funds for the operation of the county department of children's services.

Acts 1979, ch. 143, § 8; T.C.A., § 37-408.